Arkansas, session 2025, SB22.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - SHARED SERVICES. There is hereby
established for the Department of Inspector General for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) SC009 SECRETARY OF INSPECTOR GENERAL 1 GRADE SE05
(2) U125U INSPECTOR GENERAL CHIEF COUNSEL 1 GRADE SE01
(3) N199N DIG DEPUTY ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS14
(4) A143C TAX APPEALS ACCOUNTANT 1 GRADE GS13
(5) A115C DIG CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER 1 GRADE GS12
(6) G076C ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
*LCW019*
03-10-2025 16:00:51 LCW019

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB22
(7) G073C ATTORNEY 1 GRADE GS10
(8) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(9) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(10) G179C LEGAL SERVICES SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(11) C046C LEGAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 11

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - SHARED SERVICES PAYING ACCOUNT. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Inspector General, to be payable
from the paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State with transfers from the State Central Services Fund, for personal
services and operating expenses of the Department of Inspector General -
Shared Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $976,041
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 318,712
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 58,350
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,353,103

SECTION 3. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS - OFFICE OF MEDICAID INSPECTOR
GENERAL. There is hereby established for the Department of Inspector General
- Office of Medicaid Inspector General for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U124U MEDICAID INSPECTOR GENERAL 1 GRADE SE03
03-10-2025 16:00:51 LCW019

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB22
(2) L027C REGISTERED NURSE SUPERVISOR 3 GRADE MP02
(3) L038C REGISTERED NURSE 1 GRADE MP01
(4) G055N EXECUTIVE ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS13
(5) G249C DIG PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS12
(6) G250C DIG OPERATIONS MANAGER 3 GRADE GS11
(7) A044C AUDIT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS10
(8) M009C LICENSED CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORKER 1 GRADE GS09
(9) A116C BUSINESS OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(10) A113C DIG SR. AUDITOR 6 GRADE GS08
(11) C107C OMIG MEDICAL REVIEW OFFICER 3 GRADE GS08
(12) X200C MEDICAID FRAUD INVESTIGATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(13) B076C RESEARCH PROJECT ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 25

SECTION 4. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS - OFFICE OF MEDICAID INSPECTOR
GENERAL. There is hereby authorized, for the Department of Inspector General
- Office of Medicaid Inspector General for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: two
(2) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to
exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or
its successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS - OFFICE OF MEDICAID
INSPECTOR GENERAL. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Inspector General, to be payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund
Account, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
Inspector General - Office of Medicaid Inspector General - State Operations
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $701,054
(02) EXTRA HELP 4,999
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 252,992
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
03-10-2025 16:00:51 LCW019

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB22
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 187,962
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 3,400
(C) PROF. FEES 2,800
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,153,207

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - FEDERAL OPERATIONS - OFFICE OF MEDICAID
INSPECTOR GENERAL. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Inspector General, to be payable from the federal funds as designated by the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Inspector General - Office of Medicaid
Inspector General - Federal Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,009,874
(02) EXTRA HELP 5,001
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 348,059
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 209,489
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 3,800
(C) PROF. FEES 2,800
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,579,023

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - ENTERPRISE FRAUD PROGRAM - STATE - OFFICE OF
MEDICAID INSPECTOR GENERAL. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department
of Inspector General, to be payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund
Account, for personal services and operating expenses of the Enterprise Fraud
Program of the Department of Inspector General - Office of Medicaid Inspector
General - Enterprise Fraud Program - State for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

03-10-2025 16:00:51 LCW019

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB22
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ENTERPRISE FRAUD PROGRAM $900,000

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - ENTERPRISE FRAUD PROGRAM - FEDERAL - OFFICE
OF MEDICAID INSPECTOR GENERAL. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Inspector General, to be payable from the federal funds as
designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Enterprise Fraud Program of the Department of
Inspector General - Office of Medicaid Inspector General - Enterprise Fraud
Program - Federal for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ENTERPRISE FRAUD PROGRAM $3,600,000

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - CASH OPERATIONS - OFFICE OF MEDCAID
INSPECTOR GENERAL. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Inspector General, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the State
Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal
services and operating expenses of the Department of Inspector General -
Office of Medicaid Inspector General - Cash Operations for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $247,164
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 75,190
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 15,645
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 6,710
(C) PROF. FEES 1,200
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $345,909

03-10-2025 16:00:51 LCW019

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB22
SECTION 10. REGULAR SALARIES - ARKANSAS FAIR HOUSING COMMISSION. There
is hereby established for the Department of Inspector General - Arkansas Fair
Housing Commission for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N226N ARKANSAS FAIR HOUSING EXECUTIVE DIR 1 GRADE GS15
(2) G076C ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(3) G073C ATTORNEY 1 GRADE GS10
(4) X112C AFHC CHIEF INVESTIGATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(5) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(6) X150C AFHC INVESTIGATOR 5 GRADE GS06
(7) G180C GRANTS ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 11

SECTION 11. EXTRA HELP - ARKANSAS FAIR HOUSING COMMISSION. There is
hereby authorized, for the Department of Inspector General - Arkansas Fair
Housing Commission for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum
number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help",
payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: two (2) temporary
or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those
provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS FAIR HOUSING
COMMISSION. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Inspector
General, to be payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Inspector
General - Arkansas Fair Housing Commission - Operations for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
03-10-2025 16:00:51 LCW019

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB22
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $637,197
(02) EXTRA HELP 40,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 240,503
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 191,573
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 58,000
(C) PROF. FEES 57,007
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) PUBLIC EDUCATION 899
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,225,179

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - EDUCATION - TRUST - ARKANSAS FAIR HOUSING
COMMISSION. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Inspector
General, to be payable from the Arkansas Fair Housing Commission Trust Fund,
for operating expenses of the Department of Inspector General - Arkansas Fair
Housing Commission - Education - Trust for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $50,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 45,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $95,000

SECTION 14. REGULAR SALARIES - OFFICE OF INTERNAL AUDIT. There is
hereby established for the Department of Inspector General - Office of
Internal Audit for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
03-10-2025 16:00:51 LCW019

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB22
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N219N DFA ADMINISTRATOR—INTERNAL AUDIT 1 GRADE SE02
(1.1) A024N OAL INTERNAL AUDITOR 1 GRADE SE01
(2) A144C INTERNAL AUDIT DEPUTY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS15
(3) A010C AGENCY CONTROLLER II 1 GRADE GS13
(3.1) N128N DHS ASST DIR QUALITY ASSURANCE 1 GRADE GS13
(4) A021C AGENCY CONTROLLER I 1 GRADE GS12
(4.1) A014C FISCAL DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
(4.2) A031C ASSISTANT CONTROLLER 1 GRADE GS11
(5) A044C AUDIT COORDINATOR 6 GRADE GS10
(6) A066C INTERNAL AUDITOR 5 GRADE GS08
(7) A060C SENIOR AUDITOR 5 GRADE GS08
(8) A081C AUDITOR 1 GRADE GS07
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 25

SECTION 15. APPROPRIATION - OFFICE OF INTERNAL AUDIT - OPERATIONS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Inspector General, to be
payable from the State Central Services Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Inspector General - Office of
Internal Audit - Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,926,800
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 636,180
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 702,719
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 44,600
(C) PROF. FEES 51,500
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,361,799

SECTION 16. REGULAR SALARIES - INDEPENDENT TAX APPEALS COMMISSION.
03-10-2025 16:00:51 LCW019

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB22
There is hereby established for the Department of Inspector General -
Independent Tax Appeals Commission for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N247N TAX APPEALS COMMISSIONER 3 GRADE SE04
(2) G310C TAX APPEALS STAFF ATTORNEY 1 GRADE GS13
(3) G249C DIG PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS12
(4) C118C COMMISSIONER ASSISTANT 1 GRADE GS10
(5) G311C TAX APPEALS COMMISSION LAW CLERK 1 GRADE GS07
(6) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 9

SECTION 17. APPROPRIATION - INDEPENDENT TAX APPEALS COMMISSION. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Inspector General, to be payable
from the State Central Services Fund, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Inspector General - Independent Tax Appeals
Commission for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $912,118
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 278,809
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 400,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 20,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,610,927

SECTION 18. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. SHARED
03-10-2025 16:00:51 LCW019

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB22
SERVICES. (a)(1) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may create a Shared
Services paying accounts on his or her books and on the books of the
Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State for the payment of personal
services and operating expenses in the Shared Services Paying Account
Appropriation by the Department of Inspector General.
(2) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall direct the transfer
of funds and appropriations to the Shared Services Paying Account
appropriation section of this act on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(3) The transfer authority provided to the department in
subdivision (a)(2) of this section may be used to make transfers only within
the department's appropriation act or between other appropriation acts
authorized for the department.
(4) The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the
date of passage through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 19. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 20. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 21. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
03-10-2025 16:00:51 LCW019

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 SB22
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee
























03-10-2025 16:00:51 LCW019